src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/afr-za-g2.ctb
###k
contraction k
contraction K
always kabinet 13-1-12-24-45-1345
always kalender 13-1246-26-145-12456
always kalium =
always kameralens 13-1-134-12456-1-123-26-234
always kaner 13-1-1345-12456
always karakter 13-1-1235-1-13-2345-12456
begmidword karoo 13-1-1235-2356
always kasty 13-1-34-13456
begword kenter 13-26-2345-12456
word kere =
always kieue 13-1456-136-15
begword kleinser 13-123-146-1345-234-15-1235
always klere 13-123-15-1235-15
begword klets =
begword koelte 13-246-123-235
always kompanie 5-13-1234-12346-1456
always konink 13-135-1345-35-13
always konstabel 13-25-34-1-23-123
always kosmeties 13-135-234-23456-1456-234
always kriminer 13-1235-24-134-35-15-1235
always kriskras =
always kryk =
always ktabel 13-2345-1-23-123

###l
contraction l
contraction L
word laaskeer 123-2-234-13-156-1235
always laning 123-1-1345-35-1245
always later 123-1-2345-12456
midword likwi 56-13-2456-24
always literat 123-24-2345-12456-1-2345
always lokomo =
always leraar 123-15-1235-2-1235
prfword lere =
always liegery 123-1456-1245-12456-13456
always logaritme =
always lokale =
sufword lone =
begword los =
always louter 123-1256-2345-12456
always luitenan 123-345-2345-26-12346

###m
contraction m
contraction M
always maar's 134-2-1235-3-234
always maaskaas 134-2-234-13-2-234
always magnet =
always makaber 134-1-13-1-12-12456
always maneskyn 134-1-1345-15-16-13456-1345
word maskas 134-1-16-1-234
begword mede =
always mekaartel 134-15-13-2-1235-2345-15-123
word menere 134-26-15-1235-15
always mentering 134-26-2345-15-1235-35-1245
always metjie 134-15-46-15
midword metoe 134-15-2345-246
sufword midderif =
always moedersknie 134-246-145-12456-234-13-1345-1456
always moestas 134-246-34-1-234
always monder 134-25-145-15-1235
begword monet 134-135-45-1345
always môrer 134-45-146-135-1235-15-1235
always motel =

###n
contraction n
contraction N
word nanag =
sufword nasien 1345-1-5-234
word nete =
always neties 1345-15-2345-1456-234
midendword netjie 1345-15-46-15
always nieu 1345-1456-136
word nering 1345-15-1235-35-1245
always nominale 1345-135-134-35-1-123-15

###o
contraction o
contraction O
always oei 246-24
always oeuvre =
always olonie 135-123-135-1345-1456
word ontering 25-2345-15-1235-35-1245
sufword onus =
midendword ooi 2356-24
word ooie =
begword oon =
always oorlogs 456-135-123-135-1245-234
always ooskus =
always opbel =
always optel =
sufword outo 1256-2345-135

###p
contraction p
contraction P
begword perde 1234-12456-145-15
word pere =
sufword ponie 1234-135-1345-1456
always prester 1234-1235-15-34-15-1235
always protest 1234-1235-135-235-34
always protes =
always pryskartel =
always puntener 1234-136-1345-2345-26-15-1235

###q
contraction q
contraction Q
always qu =

###r
contraction r
contraction R
always rebel =
always rebelleer 1235-15-23-123-123-156-1235
always redener 1235-15-145-26-15-1235
always regter 5-1235-2345-12456
always requiem =
always resteren 1235-15-34-15-1235-26
always riskant 1235-24-16-12346-2345
begword roter =
always ruskans 1235-136-234-13-12346-234

###s
contraction s
contraction S
always s'n 234-3-1345
always sameroep 234-1-134-15-1235-246-1234
always salomo =
always samen 234-1-134-26
prfword sere =
sufword serie 234-15-1235-1456
endword serie 234-15-1235-1456
always serum 234-15-1235-136-134
begword ses =
always sestig 234-15-34-24-1245
prfword sfere =
always silwer 234-24-123-2456-12456
always singel 234-35-123456-123
always singery 234-35-1245-12456-13456
always sirene =
always skafee 234-13-1-124-156
always skaker 16-1-13-15-1235
always skapit =
always skater 16-1-2345-12456
midendword skeerkring 234-13-156-1235-13-1235-35-1245
prfword skene 16-15-1345-15
always skl =
endword sklere =
always skomen 234-13-135-134-26 # eerskomende/laaskomende
always skomitee 234-5-13-24-2345-156
always skommis 234-5-13-134-24-234
always skontr 234-13-25-2345-1235
always skoste 234-13-135-34-15		
always skredie 234-13-1235-15-2346
always skrobber 16-1235-135-12-12-15-1235
always skund =
always skursus =
always slanery 234-123-1-1345-12456-13456
always slinger 234-123-35-1245-12456
always somber 234-135-134-12-12456
always sorter =
always sous 234-1256-234
always spinnerak 234-1234-35-1345-15-1235-1-13
midendword stabel =
prfword stanery 34-1-1345-12456-13456
always stereo 34-15-1235-15-135
always stralek 34-1235-1-123-15-13
midword strekk =
always strofe 34-1235-135-124-15
always studer 34-136-145-15-1235
always styd 234-5-2345
begword sub =
begword sugg 234-136-1245-1245
prfword suite =
always surplus =
always sy's 234-13456-3-234
always sy't 234-13456-3-2345

###t
contraction t
contraction T
always tabel =
always tabellar 2345-1-23-123-123-1-1235
always tapisserie 2345-1-1234-24-234-234-12456-1456
always tee 2345-156
always tei 2345-146
endword teke 2345-15-13-15
always teken 2345-15-13-26
word tel =
word teling 2345-15-123-35-1245
begword telk =
midendword tenis 2345-26-24-234
always tepel =
word tere =
always terg 2345-12456-1245
sufword tering 2345-15-1235-35-1245
always terugker 235-1235-136-1245-13-15-1235
word tes =
begword tesour 2345-15-234-1256-1235
begword test 2345-15-34
always teu =
word tewens 2345-15-2456-26-234
always teë =
begword tinger 2345-35-1245-12456
always toonaangew 2345-2356-1345-126-1245-15-2456
always tower 2345-135-2456-12456
always tragedie 2345-1235-1-1245-15-2346

###u
always uiter 345-2345-12456
always uitsteken 345-2345-34-15-13-26

###v
contraction v
contraction V
always vang 1236-12346-1245
endword vange 1236-12346-123456
endword vangeneming 1236-12346-123456-1345-15-134-35-1245
begword vas =
prfword vaster 1236-1-34-12456
prfword vere =
begword vergetel 1236-12456-1245-15-235-123
always vergeten 1236-12456-1245-15-2345-26
always verkenningstog 1236-12456-13-26-1345-35-1245-234-456-2345
always vermetel 1236-12456-134-15-235-123
always vermiste 1236-12456-134-24-34-15
always verskal 1236-12456-234-13-1246
always vertel 1236-12456-2345-15-123
always vester 1236-15-34-15-1235
always veter 1236-15-2345-12456
always vinger 1236-35-1245-12456
always viskop =
always viskuit 1236-24-234-13-345-2345
always visteelt 1236-24-234-2345-156-123-2345
endword vole =
always vomer =
always voornemens 456-1236-1345-15-134-26-234
always vredestog 1236-1235-15-145-15-234-456-2345
always vroue 1236-1235-1256-15
always vrouens 1236-1235-1256-26-234
always vrygewi 1236-1235-13456-1245-15-2456-24

###w
contraction w
contraction W
always waar's 2456-2-1235-3-234
always wassen 346-234-26
always water 2456-1-2345-12456
always wat-s 2456-1-2345-3-234
always wederker 2456-15-145-12456-13-15-1235
always welterge 2456-15-123-2345-12456-123456
always werkgew 5-2456-1245-15-2456
always weskus =
always wins 2456-35-234
always winste 2456-35-34-15
always wysger =

###x
contraction x
contraction X

###y
contraction y
contraction Y
begword yskou 13456-234-13-1256

###z
contraction z
contraction Z
word zero =

###á
always ál =

###ó
always óf =

###ë
always ëe =
always ëi 45-25-15-24
always ënter =

###ï
always ïe 45-25-24-15
always ïnter 45-25-24-1345-2345-12456
